Maryland, session 2025, SB0648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–309.
(a) This section applies to any incarcerated individual who is sentenced to a term
of incarceration for which all sentences being served, including any life sentence, are with
the possibility of parole.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0648*

SENATE BILL 648
(b) An incarcerated individual who is so chronically debilitated or incapacitated
by a medical or mental health condition, disease, or syndrome as to be physically incapable
of presenting a danger to society may be released on medical parole at any time during the
term of that incarcerated individual’s sentence, without regard to the eligibility standards
specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) A request for a medical parole under this section may be filed with the
Maryland Parole Commission by:
(i) the incarcerated individual seeking the medical parole;
(ii) an attorney;
(iii) a prison official or employee;
(iv) a medical professional;
(v) a family member; or
(vi) any other person.
(2) The request shall be in writing and shall articulate the grounds that
support the appropriateness of granting the medical parole.
(d) Following review of the request, the Commission may:
(1) find the request to be inconsistent with the best interests of public
safety and take no further action; or
(2) request that department or local correctional facility personnel provide
information for formal consideration of parole release.
(e) The information to be considered by the Commission before granting medical
parole shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) (i) a recommendation by the medical professional treating the
incarcerated individual under contract with the Department or local correctional facility;
or
(ii) if requested by an individual identified in subsection (c)(1) of this
section, one medical evaluation conducted at no cost to the incarcerated individual by a
medical professional who is independent from the Division of Correction or local
correctional facility;
(2) the incarcerated individual’s medical information, including:

SENATE BILL 648 3
(i) a description of the incarcerated individual’s condition, disease,
or syndrome;
(ii) a prognosis concerning the likelihood of recovery from the
condition, disease, or syndrome;
(iii) a description of the incarcerated individual’s physical incapacity
and score on the Karnofsky Performance Scale Index or similar classification of physical
impairment; and
(iv) a mental health evaluation, where relevant;
(3) discharge information, including:
(i) availability of treatment or professional services within the
community;
(ii) family support within the community; and
(iii) housing availability, including hospital or hospice care; and
(4) case management information, including:
(i) the circumstances of the current offense;
(ii) institutional history;
(iii) pending charges, sentences in other jurisdictions, and any other
detainers; and
(iv) criminal history information.
(f) The Commission may require as a condition of release on medical parole that:
(1) the parolee agree to placement for a definite or indefinite period of time
in a hospital or hospice or other housing accommodation suitable to the parolee’s medical
condition, including the family home of the parolee, as specified by the Commission or the
supervising agent; and
(2) the parolee forward authentic copies of applicable medical records to
indicate that the particular medical condition giving rise to the release continues to exist.
(g) (1) If the Commission has reason to believe that a parolee is no longer so
debilitated or incapacitated as to be physically incapable of presenting a danger to society,
the parolee shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Correction or the local
correctional facility from which the incarcerated individual was released.

SENATE BILL 648
(2) (i) A parole hearing for a parolee returned to custody shall be held
to consider whether the parolee remains incapacitated and shall be heard promptly.
(ii) A parolee returned to custody under this subsection shall be
maintained in custody, if the incapacitation is found to no longer exist.
(3) An incarcerated individual whose medical parole is revoked for lack of
continued incapacitation may be considered for parole in accordance with the eligibility
requirements specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle.
(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, provisions of law relating to
victim notification and opportunity to be heard shall apply to proceedings relating to
medical parole.
(2) In cases of imminent death, time limits relating to victim notification
and opportunity to be heard may be reduced or waived in the discretion of the Commission.
[(i) (1) If the Commission decides to grant medical parole to an incarcerated
individual sentenced to life imprisonment, the decision shall be transmitted to the
Governor.
(2) The Governor may disapprove the decision by written transmittal to
the Commission.
(3) If the Governor does not disapprove the decision within 180 days after
receipt of the written transmittal, the decision becomes effective.]
[(j)] (I) The Commission shall issue regulations to implement the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.